Hawaii statutes.
§431P-16.5 Immunity. There shall be no
cause of action, claim for damages or relief, charge, or any other liability of
any kind whatsoever created against the State, the Hawaii hurricane relief
fund, the commissioner, or their respective agents, employees, or board, by, or
relating to the loss mitigation grant program. [L 2002, c 179, §4; am L 2011, c
124, §48]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next